FOMA_Scripts/german.lexc
LEXICON NNeut-0/ienSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^ien #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^ien #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^ien #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^ien #;



LEXICON NNeut-a/ata
Sperma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-a/ataSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-a^ata #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-a^ata #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-a^ata #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-a^ata #;

LEXICON NNeut-a/en
Stigma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-a/enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-a^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-a^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-a^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-a^en #;



LEXICON NNeut-on/a
Lexikon NNeut-on/aSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-on/aSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-on^a #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-on^a #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-on^a #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-on^a #;

LEXICON NNeut-s/$sser
fass    NNeut-s/$sserSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-s/$sserSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-s+um^sser #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-s+um^sser #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-s+um^sser #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-s+um^sser #;

LEXICON NNeut-um/a
Fatum NNeut-um/aSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-um/aSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-um^a #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-um^a #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-um^a #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-um^a #;

LEXICON NNeut-um/en
Forum    NNeut-um/enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-um/enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-um^en #;


LEXICON NNeut/Pl
Kapitalien    NNeut/PlSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut/PlSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;


LEXICON NNeut/Sg_es
Malz    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut/Sg_esSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;

LEXICON NNeut/Sg_s
Misstrauen NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut/Sg_sSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;

LEXICON NNeut_0_x
Newton    NNeut_0_xSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_0_xSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$e
Giftzahn NNeut_es_$eSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$eSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^e #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^e #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^e #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$er
Grab    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$erSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^er #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^er #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^ern #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^er #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_e
Grundstück    NNeut_es_eSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_eSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_en
Insekt    NNeut_es_enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_er
Kind    NNeut_es_erSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_erSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^er #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^er #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^ern #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^er #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_$
Kloster NNeut_s_$SPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_$SPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^ #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^ #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^n #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^ #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_0
Knödel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_0SPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_e
Kollektiv    NNeut_s_eSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_eSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_en
Melodram    NNeut_s_enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;


LEXICON NNeut_s_n
Wochenende    NNeut_s_nSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_nSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;


LEXICON NNeut_s_s
Wrack    NNeut_s_sSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_sSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^s #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_x
Zeichen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_xSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;
